Utah statutes.
17C-2-110.   Amending an urban renewal project area plan.
(1)  An adopted urban renewal project area plan may be amended as provided in
this section.
(2)  If an agency proposes to amend an adopted urban renewal project area plan
to enlarge the project area:
(a)  subject to Subsection (2)(e), the requirements under this part that apply
to adopting a project area plan apply equally to the proposed amendment as if
it were a proposed project area plan;
(b)  for a pre-July 1, 1993 project area plan, the base year taxable value for
the new area added to the project area shall be determined under Subsection
17C-1-102(6)(a)(i) using the effective date of the amended project area plan;
(c)  for a post-June 30, 1993 project area plan:
(i)  the base year taxable value for the new area added to the project area
shall be determined under Subsection 17C-1-102(6)(a)(ii) using the date of the
taxing entity committee's consent referred to in Subsection (2)(c)(ii); and
(ii)  the agency shall obtain the consent of the taxing entity committee
before the agency may collect tax increment from the area added to the project
area by the amendment;
(d)  the agency shall make a finding regarding the existence of blight in the
area proposed to be added to the project area by following the procedure set
forth in Subsections 17C-2-102(1)(a)(i) and (ii); and
(e)  the agency need not make a finding regarding the existence of blight in
the project area as described in the original project area plan, if the agency
made a finding of the existence of blight regarding that project area in
connection with adoption of the original project area plan.
(3)  If a proposed amendment does not propose to enlarge an urban renewal
project area, an agency board may adopt a resolution approving an amendment to
an adopted project area plan after:
(a)  the agency gives notice, as provided in Section 17C-2-502, of the
proposed amendment and of the public hearing required by Subsection (3)(b);
(b)  the agency board holds a public hearing on the proposed amendment that
meets the requirements of a plan hearing;
(c)  the agency obtains the taxing entity committee's consent to the
amendment, if the amendment proposes:
(i)  to enlarge the area within the project area from which tax increment is
collected;
(ii)  to permit the agency to receive a greater percentage of tax increment or
to receive tax increment for a longer period of time, or both, than allowed
under the adopted project area plan; or
(iii)  for an amendment to a project area plan that was adopted before April
1, 1983, to expand the area from which tax increment is collected to exceed
100 acres of private property; and
(d)  the agency obtains the consent of the legislative body or governing board
of each taxing entity affected, if the amendment proposes to permit the agency
to receive, from less than all taxing entities, a greater percentage of tax
increment or to receive tax increment for a longer period of time, or both,
than allowed under the adopted project area plan.
(4) (a)  An adopted urban renewal project area plan may be amended without
complying with the notice and public hearing requirements of Subsections
(2)(a) and (3)(a) and (b) and without obtaining taxing entity committee
approval under Subsection (3)(c) if the amendment:
(i)  makes a minor adjustment in the legal description of a project area
boundary requested by a county assessor or county auditor to avoid
inconsistent property boundary lines; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (4)(b), removes a parcel of real property from a
project area because the agency determines that:
(A)  the parcel is no longer blighted; or
(B)  inclusion of the parcel is no longer necessary or desirable to the
project area.
(b)  An amendment removing a parcel of real property from a project area under
Subsection (4)(a)(ii) may not be made without the consent of the record
property owner of the parcel being removed.
(5) (a)  An amendment approved by board resolution under this section may not
take effect until adopted by ordinance of the legislative body of the
community in which the project area that is the subject of the project area
plan being amended is located.
(b)  Upon a community legislative body passing an ordinance adopting an
amendment to a project area plan, the agency whose project area plan was
amended shall comply with the requirements of Sections 17C-2-108 and 17C-2-109
to the same extent as if the amendment were a project area plan.
